Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6115.04
Anti-takeover provision; violation; penalty.

Any director or officer of a person or an agent of the person who knowingly violates or assents to or permits any officer or agent of the person to violate the requirements of section 44-6115 may be required by the Director of Insurance, after notice and hearing, to pay, in his or her individual capacity, an administrative penalty of not more than five thousand dollars per violation. In determining the amount of the penalty, the Director of Insurance shall take into account the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations, and such other matters as justice may require.

Laws 1997, LB 52, § 12.